Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 4
DERIVATIVE SUITS

7-126-401. Derivative suits.

Without affecting the right of a member or director to bring a proceeding against a nonprofit corporation or its officers or directors, a proceeding may be brought in the right of a nonprofit corporation to procure a judgment in its favor by:

Any voting member or voting members having five percent or more of the voting power; or

Any director.

In any such proceeding, each complainant shall be a voting member or director at the time of bringing the proceeding.

A complaint in a proceeding brought in the right of a nonprofit corporation must be verified and allege with particularity the demand made, if any, to obtain action by the directors and either why the complainants could not obtain the action or why they did not make the demand. If a demand for action was made and the nonprofit corporation's investigation of the demand is in progress when the proceeding is filed, the court may stay the suit until the investigation is completed.

In any action instituted in the right of a nonprofit corporation by one or more voting members, the court having jurisdiction over the matter may, at any time before final judgment, require the plaintiff to give security for the costs and reasonable expenses that may be directly attributable to and incurred by the nonprofit corporation in the defense of such action or may be incurred by other parties named as defendant for which the nonprofit corporation may become legally liable, but not including fees of attorneys. The amount of such security may from time to time be increased or decreased, in the discretion of the court, upon showing that the security provided has or may become inadequate or is excessive. If the court finds that the action was commenced without reasonable cause, the nonprofit corporation shall have recourse to such security in such amount as the court shall determine upon the termination of such action.

No action shall be commenced in this state by a member of a foreign nonprofit corporation in the right of a foreign nonprofit corporation unless such action is permitted by the law of the state under which such foreign nonprofit corporation is incorporated.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 673, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(5) amended, p. 2338, § 292, effective July 1, 2004.